Alabama, session 2026rs, HB363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) As used in this section, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) CHURCH BUILDING. Any church building, mosque,
synagogue, or other religious real property.
(2) CHURCH PROPERTY. The area contiguous to a church
building which is used for ingress or egress to the church
building or any other religious purpose.
(3) DISORDERLY CONDUCT. The crime of disorderly conduct
pursuant to Section 13A-11-7, Code of Alabama 1975.
(4) HARASSMENT. The crime of harassment pursuant to
Section 13A-11-8(a), Code of Alabama 1975.
(5) RIOT. The crime of riot pursuant to Section
13A-11-3, Code of Alabama 1975.
(6) WORSHIP SERVICE. The assemblage of individuals for
religious worship.
(b) An individual commits the crime of disruption of a
Page 1

(b) An individual commits the crime of disruption of a
HB363 Engrossed
worship service if, during a worship service that has a
scheduled starting time, the individual knowingly enters a
church building or church property with the intent to disrupt
the worship service and does any of the following:
(1) Engages in a riot.
(2) Engages in disorderly conduct.
(3) Engages in harassment of any individual participant
of the worship service.
(4) Obstructs the ingress or egress to the church
building or church property.
(c) An individual who violates this section shall be
guilty of a Class C felony.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB363 Engrossed


House of Representatives
Read for the first time and referred ................29-Jan-26
to the House of Representatives
committee on Public Safety and
Homeland Security

Read for the second time and placed ................05-Feb-26
on the calendar:
1 amendment

Read for the third time and passed ................24-Feb-26
as amended
Yeas 75
Nays 27
Abstains 2


John Treadwell
Clerk

Page 3